Massachusetts, session 194th, S2060.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2008 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after paragraph (a) the following new paragraph:-
(b) A credit of $2,500 shall be allowed against the taxes due if the taxpayer has provided
more than one-half of the support for an elderly relative who has attained the age of 70 before the
taxable year, or for a totally disabled relative with Alzheimer’s Disease or Dementia, provided
that the relative resided with the taxpayer for more than 6 months of the taxable year. If the
credit provided in this section reduces the tax to zero, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a refund
equal to the amount by which the amount of the credit exceeded the amount of tax due.
of 1